North Carolina statutes. Chapter 68. Fences and Stock Law.
Article 4. Stock along the Outer Banks.

§ 68-42.
Stock running at large prohibited; certain ponies excepted.

From and after July 1, 1958, it shall be unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to allow his or its horses, cattle, goats, sheep, or hogs to run free or at large along the outer banks of this State. This Article shall not apply to horses known as marsh ponies or banks ponies on Ocracoke Island, Hyde County. This Article shall not apply to horses known as marsh ponies or banks ponies on Shackleford Banks between Beaufort Inlet and Barden’s Inlet in Carteret County. Saving and excepting those animals known as “banker ponies” on the island of Ocracoke owned by the Boy Scouts and not exceeding 35 in number.

History.

1957, c. 1057, s. 1; 1997-456, s. 9.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on local legislation in the General Assembly, discussing Chadwick v. Salter,

254 N.C. 389

, 119 S.E.2d 158 (1961), see 45 N.C.L. Rev. 340 (1967).

§ 68-43.
Authority of Secretary of Environmental Quality to remove or confine ponies on Ocracoke Island and Shackleford Banks.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Article, the Secretary of Environmental Quality shall have authority to remove or cause to be removed from Ocracoke Island and Shackleford Banks all ponies known as banks ponies or marsh ponies if and when he determines that such action is essential to prevent damage to the island. In the event such a determination is made, the Secretary, in lieu of removing all ponies, may require that they be restricted to a certain area or corralled so as to prevent damage to the island. In the event such action is taken, the Secretary is authorized to take such steps and act through his duly designated employees or such other persons as, in his opinion, he deems necessary and he may accept any assistance provided by or through the National Park Service.

History.

1957, c. 1057, s. 11/2; 1973, c. 1262, s. 86; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(10); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 1997-456, s. 10; 2015-241, s. 14.30(v).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(v), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Secretary of Environmental Quality” for “Secretary of Environment and Natural Resources” wherever it appears.

§ 68-44.
Penalty for violation of G.S. 68-42.

Any person, firm or corporation violating the provisions of

G.S. 68-42

shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1957, c. 1057, s. 2; 1993, c. 539, s. 541; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 68-45.
Impounding stock.

The provisions of

G.S. 68-24

to 68-30, relative to the impounding of stock running at large shall apply with equal force and effect along the outer banks of this State.

History.

1957, c. 1057, s. 3.

§ 68-46.
“Outer banks of this State” defined.

For the purposes of this Article, the terms “outer banks of this State” shall be construed to mean all of that part of North Carolina which is separated from the mainland by a body of water, such as an inlet or sound, and which is in part bounded by the Atlantic Ocean.

History.

1957, c. 1057, s. 4.